Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 2011
68-1901
Act, how cited.

Sections 68-1901 to
68-1930 shall be known and may be cited as the Nursing Facility Quality Assurance
Assessment Act.

Laws 2011, LB600, § 1.
July 1, 2011